Utah statutes.
53A-6-702.   Rules.

(1)  The State Board of Education shall make rules:

(a)  specifying procedures for applying for and awarding the scholarships described in Section 53A-6-701;

(b)  specifying criteria for selecting scholarship recipients;

(c)  requiring the repayment by a teacher of a prorated portion of a scholarship, if the teacher fails to comply with the conditions of the scholarship as provided in Section 53A-6-701; and

(d)  specifying education expenses that may be paid with scholarship money.

(2)  The board rules shall provide that priority in awarding scholarships shall be given to applicants teaching in schools in critical need of a teacher with a particular endorsement or a master's degree as documented by the school principal or school district superintendent.

